Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-507
Civil action authorized; remedies authorized.

A civil action may be brought in the district court having jurisdiction by an employee to enforce the Family Military Leave Act. The district court may enjoin any act or practice that violates or may violate the Family Military Leave Act and may order any other equitable relief that is necessary and appropriate to redress the violation or to enforce the act.

Laws 2007, LB497, § 7.